North Carolina statutes. Chapter 57D. North Carolina Limited Liability Company Act.
Part 4. Registered Office and Registered Agent.

§ 57D-2-40.
Registered office and registered agent.

Each LLC must maintain a registered office and registered agent as required by Article 4 of Chapter 55D of the General Statutes and is subject to service on the Secretary of State under that Article.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§§ 57D-2-41 through 57D-2-49.

Reserved for future codification purposes.